Alaska, session 34, HB126.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 10.06.960(k) is amended to read: 06 (k) Notwithstanding (i) of this section and the requirement provided under 07 AS 10.06.633(e) that a corporation may only be reinstated within two years from 08 the date of the certificate of involuntary dissolution, a corporation that is organized 09 as a Native village corporation under the Act and [,] that has been involuntarily 10 dissolved by the commissioner under AS 10.06.633 [, AND THAT HAS FAILED TO 11 APPLY FOR REINSTATEMENT DURING THE PERIOD ESTABLISHED UNDER 12 AS 10.06.633(e)] may be reinstated under AS 10.06.633(e) at any time [ON OR 13 BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2020]. The reinstated corporation and its shareholders 14 have all of the rights, privileges, liabilities, and obligations that would have applied to 01 them if the corporation had not been dissolved, and all corporate and shareholder 02 actions taken during the period of dissolution are considered to be as valid as if 03 dissolution had not occurred. If a corporation elects to reinstate under this subsection 04 and if the corporation's previously used corporate name is no longer available for use 05 by the corporation, then, notwithstanding AS 10.06.502 - 10.06.510, an amendment to 06 the articles of incorporation changing the previously used corporate name may be 07 adopted by action of the corporation's board of directors alone. 08 * Sec. 2. AS 10.20.325 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 09 (b) A corporation organized under this chapter for a religious purpose that is 10 dissolved under (a) of this section may be reinstated at any time if it is established to 11 the satisfaction of the commissioner that in fact there was no cause for the dissolution, 12 or if the neglect, omission, delinquency, or noncompliance resulting in dissolution has 13 been corrected and payment made of double the amount delinquent along with the 14 amount the corporation would have paid had it not been dissolved during the period 15 between the date the certificate of dissolution was issued and the date of reinstatement. 16 Reinstatement may not be authorized if the corporation's name is no longer available 17 for use under AS 10.20.021(b), unless the corporation being reinstated amends its 18 articles of incorporation to change its name to conform with AS 10.20.021(b). Nothing 19 in this subsection relieves the reinstated corporation from penalty or forfeiture of its 20 powers in a case of failure to pay subsequently accruing licenses and taxes imposed by 21 a law of the state. 22 * Sec. 3. AS 10.20.630(a) is amended to read: 23 (a) The biennial report of a domestic or foreign corporation must be delivered 24 to the commissioner before July 2 of the reporting year. A domestic corporation filing 25 its articles of incorporation and a foreign corporation receiving a certificate of 26 authority during an even-numbered year must file the biennial report before July 2 of 27 each even-numbered year. A corporation filing its articles of incorporation or 28 receiving its certificate of authority during an odd-numbered year must file the 29 biennial report before July 2 of each odd-numbered year. The biennial report is 30 delinquent if not filed before August 1 of each odd or even year as provided in this 31 section. Delinquent returns are subject to the penalty prescribed in AS 10.20.325(a) 01 [AS 10.20.325]. 02 * Sec. 4. AS 10.40.150 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 03 (c) A corporation dissolved under (a) of this section may be reinstated at any 04 time if it is established to the satisfaction of the commissioner of commerce, 05 community, and economic development that in fact there was no cause for the 06 dissolution, or if the neglect, omission, delinquency, or noncompliance resulting in 07 dissolution has been corrected and payment made of double the amount delinquent 08 along with the amount the corporation would have paid had it not been dissolved 09 during the period between the date the certificate of dissolution was issued and the 10 date of reinstatement. Reinstatement may not be authorized if the corporation's name 11 is no longer available for use under AS 10.40.015, unless the corporation being 12 reinstated amends its articles of incorporation to change its name to conform with 13 AS 10.40.015. Nothing in this subsection relieves the reinstated corporation from 14 penalty or forfeiture of its powers in a case of failure to pay subsequently accruing 15 licenses and taxes imposed by a law of the state. 16 * Sec. 5. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.